data/giellatekno/morphology/stems/testnouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl
+Paradigm=asAapõN +Paradigm=asAhkõrõN +Paradigm=asAikõN +Paradigm=asAitõN +Paradigm=asAmmõzN +Paradigm=asKattiN +Paradigm=asKoirõN +Paradigm=asKukkõN +Paradigm=asKõikkN +Paradigm=asLentüzN +Paradigm=asLuikkoN +Paradigm=asLuzikkõN +Paradigm=asMansikõzN +Paradigm=asOmõnN +Paradigm=asPartõN +Paradigm=asPliittõN +Paradigm=asPoikõN +Paradigm=asPäiveN +Paradigm=asSininN +Paradigm=asTüttöN

!! Nominals are inflected for Number and Case

!! !!Number
 +Sg !!= * @CODE@ = singular
 +Pl !!= * @CODE@ = plural

!! !!Case
 +Abe !!= * @CODE@ = abessive
 +Acc !!= * @CODE@ = accusative
 +Abl !!= * @CODE@ = ablative case
 +Ade !!= * @CODE@ = adessive
 +All !!= * @CODE@ = allative
 +Dat !!= * @CODE@ = dative case
 +Ela !!= * @CODE@ = elative
 +Ess !!= * @CODE@ = essive
 +Exe !!= * @CODE@ = essive
 +Gen !!= * @CODE@ = genitive case
 +Ill !!= * @CODE@ = illative
 +Ine !!= * @CODE@ = inessive
 +Ins !!= * @CODE@ = instrumental
 +Instr !!= * @CODE@ = instructive -IN
 +Lat !!= * @CODE@ = Lative
 +Loc !!= * @CODE@ = Locative
 +Nom !!= * @CODE@ = nominative case
 +Par !!= * @CODE@ = partitive
 +Prl !!= * @CODE@ = prolative
 +Tra !!= * @CODE@ = translative
 +Voc !!= * @CODE@ = Vocative



LEXICON Root
nouns ;


LEXICON nouns
jalkõ:jalkõ N_aikõ ;
aikõ:aikõ N_aikõ ;
tüttö:tüttö N_tüttö ;
püttö:püttö N_tüttö ;
poikõ:poikõ N_poikõ ;



LEXICON N_aapõ
+Paradigm=asAapõN # ;

LEXICON N_sinin
+Paradigm=asSininN # ;

LEXICON N_aikõ
+Paradigm=asAikõN # ;

LEXICON N_poikõ
+Paradigm=asPoikõN # ;

LEXICON N_koirõ
+Paradigm=asKoirõN # ;

LEXICON N_lentüz
+Paradigm=asLentüzN # ;

LEXICON N_luzikkõ
+Paradigm=asLuzikkõN # ;

LEXICON N_luikko
+Paradigm=asLuikkoN # ;

LEXICON N_aitõ
+Paradigm=asAitõN # ;

LEXICON N_ahkõrõ
+Paradigm=asAhkõrõN # ;

LEXICON N_omõn
+Paradigm=asOmõnN # ;

LEXICON N_pliittõ
+Paradigm=asPliittõN # ;

LEXICON N_mansikõz
+Paradigm=asMansikõzN # ;

LEXICON N_katti
+Paradigm=asKattiN # ;

LEXICON N_ammõz
+Paradigm=asAmmõzN # ;

LEXICON N_kõikk
+Paradigm=asKõikkN # ;

LEXICON N_tüttö
+Paradigm=asTüttöN # ;

LEXICON N_kukkõ
+Paradigm=asKukkõN # ;

LEXICON N_päive
+Paradigm=asPäiveN # ;

LEXICON N_partõ
+Paradigm=asPartõN # ;
